Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1920
Application; investigated by Secretary of State.

The secretary shall investigate or cause to be investigated each application for an examiner or intern's license in order to determine that all information and statements in the application are correct. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number. The secretary shall not issue the license until the investigation is complete. The investigation shall be completed within ninety days after receipt of the application.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 228.